Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.080

Duties of person over whose property the receiver is appointed.

The person over whose property the receiver is appointed shall:

(1) Assist and cooperate fully with the receiver in the administration of the estate and the discharge of the receiver's duties, and comply with all orders of the court;

(2) Supply to the receiver information necessary to enable the receiver to complete any schedules that the receiver may be required to file under RCW 7.60.090, and otherwise assist the receiver in the completion of the schedules;

(3) Upon the receiver's appointment, deliver into the receiver's possession all of the property of the estate in the person's possession, custody, or control, including, but not limited to, all accounts, books, papers, records, and other documents; and

(4) Following the receiver's appointment, submit to examination by the receiver, or by any other person upon order of the court, under oath, concerning the acts, conduct, property, liabilities, and financial condition of that person or any matter relating to the receiver's administration of the estate.

When the person over whose property the receiver is appointed is an entity, each of the officers, directors, managers, members, partners, or other individuals exercising or having the power to exercise control over the affairs of the entity are subject to the requirements of this section.

[ 2004 c 165 s 10.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.